Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-637
Ticket; purchase price limitation.

No ticket used in the conduct of any lottery shall have an individual purchase price in excess of one hundred dollars.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 77.